Utah statutes.
13-11-23.   Other remedies available -- Class action only as prescribed by
act.
The remedies of this act are in addition to remedies otherwise available for
the same conduct under state or local law, except that a class action relating
to a transaction governed by this act may be brought only as prescribed by
this act.
